Utah statutes.
58-24b-405.   Animal physical therapy.

(1)  Subject to Subsection 58-28-307(12)(b), a licensed physical therapist may practice animal physical therapy if the licensed physical therapist completes at least 100 hours of animal physical therapy training and education, which shall include:

(a)  50 hours of on-the-job training under the supervision of a licensed veterinarian;

(b)  completion of a quadruped anatomy course; and

(c)  continuing education for the required hours remaining.

(2)  Subject to Subsection 58-28-307(12)(b), a licensed physical therapist assistant may practice animal physical therapy, within the scope of the licensed physical therapist assistant's practice, if the licensed physical therapist assistant:

(a)  is under the on-site supervision or general supervision of a physical therapist who has complied with the requirements of Subsection (1); and

(b)  completes at least 100 hours of animal physical therapy training and education, which shall include:

(i)  50 hours of on-the-job training under the supervision of a licensed veterinarian;

(ii)  completion of a quadruped anatomy course; and

(iii)  continuing education for the required hours remaining.



Enacted by Chapter 220, 2009 General Session

